Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Administration of the Workforce Investment Act programs in Mississippi

§ 7-1-351.
Department of Economic and Community Development to be Division of Job Development and Training [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The Department of Economic and Community Development shall be the Division of Job Development and Training and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Division of Job Development and Training and wherever the term “Division of Job Development and Training” shall appear in any law it shall mean the Department of Economic and Community Development. The executive director may assign to appropriate divisions powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-1-353.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§7-1-353. [En Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 2]

§ 7-1-355.
Administration of Workforce Investment Act programs; annual report on Workforce Investment Act activities [Repealed effective July 1, 2023; For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, is designated as the sole administrator of all programs for which the state is the prime sponsor under Title 1(B) of Public Law 105-220, Workforce Investment Act of 1998, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, and may take all necessary action to secure to this state the benefits of that legislation. The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, may receive and disburse funds for those programs that become available to it from any source.

The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, shall establish guidelines on the amount and/or percentage of indirect and/or administrative expenses by the local fiscal agent or the Workforce Development Center operator. The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, shall develop an accountability system and make an annual report to the Legislature before December 31 of each year on Workforce Investment Act activities. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

The total number of individuals served through the Workforce Development Centers and the percentage and number of individuals for which a quarterly follow-up is provided;

The number of individuals who receive core services by each center;

The number of individuals who receive intensive services by each center;

The number of Workforce Investment Act vouchers issued by the Workforce Development Centers including:

A list of schools and colleges to which these vouchers were issued and the average cost per school of the vouchers; and

A list of the types of programs for which these vouchers were issued;

The number of individuals placed in a job through Workforce Development Centers;

The monies and the amount retained for administrative and other costs received from Workforce Investment Act funds for each agency or organization that Workforce Investment Act funds flow through as a percentage and actual dollar amount of all Workforce Investment Act funds received.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 57; Laws, 2005, ch. 391, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 57; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 57; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 58; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 57, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 2019).

§ 7-1-357.
Cooperation with agencies, institutions and other entities [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The division of job development and training, office of the governor, is hereby authorized to cooperate with or enter into agreements with any agency, official, educational institution or political subdivision of this state, any agency or official of the government of the United States of America, or any private person, firm, partnership or corporation in order to carry out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 7-1-359.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544 § 48, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§7-1-359. [En Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 5]

§ 7-1-361.
Rules and regulations [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The division of job development and training, office of the governor, is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 7-1-363.
Contracts with the division of vocational-technical education [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

To the maximum extent practicable, the Department of Economic and Community Development shall contract with the Division of Vocational-Technical Education of the State Department of Education all programs embracing an institutional training component. Such programs shall be contracted to the Division of Vocational-Technical Education of the State Department of Education, except those programs funded by the Governor’s special grant, shall be coordinated with and complementary to the existing state public educational systems and shall not be duplicative or competitive in nature to such systems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-1-365.
Cooperation with certain other state boards and commissions [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The state department of education, vocational-technical division, the board of trustees of any junior college district, the board of trustees of any school district, the Mississippi Employment Security Commission, and the division of job development and training, office of the governor, shall cooperate in carrying out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 7-1-367.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§7-1-367. [En Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 9]

§ 7-1-369.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 366, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1983).

§7-1-369. [En Laws 1980, ch. 496, § 10]

§ 7-1-371.
State assets or personnel not to be utilized without federal reimbursement [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

Unless wholly reimbursed from federal funds, no state funds, personnel, assets or resources shall be utilized in carrying out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1980.